Utah statutes.
17-16-18.   Salaries paid out of general fund.

The salaries of county officers shall be paid monthly, semi-monthly, or bi-weekly, as determined by the county legislative body, out of the general fund or the salary fund, as the case may be, of the county upon the order of the county legislative body.



Amended by Chapter 186, 2009 General Session

